California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(d) To foster the development of leadership skills and a commitment to community development among youth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9801.

(a) The director, from funds appropriated for this purpose to the YouthBuild Program, may make grants to applicants for the purpose of carrying out programs as authorized by this article. For the purpose of administering and managing the grant-making process, the director may contract with a qualified nonprofit corporation designated by the United States Department of Labor to provide technical assistance to YouthBuild programs. All programs shall have strong youth and community involvement.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meaning:

(1) “YouthBuild Program” means the overall California YouthBuild Program, as coordinated by the director.

(2) “Program” means an individual program funded by a grant made by the director to an applicant as part of the overall YouthBuild Program.

(c) “Applicant” means an entity that applies for a program grant pursuant to Section 9807.

(d) “Participant” means a person eligible to participate in a program pursuant to Section 9805.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   (AB 271)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.

Programs shall provide, at a minimum, all of the following services:

(a) (1) Acquisition, rehabilitation, acquisition and rehabilitation, or construction of housing and related facilities to be used for the purpose of providing home ownership for disadvantaged persons, residential housing for homeless individuals and very low income families, or transitional housing for persons who are homeless, ill, deinstitutionalized, or who have disabilities or special needs.

(2) Rehabilitation or construction of community facilities owned by public agencies or nonprofit entities.

(b) (1) Integrated education and job training services and activities or an equally divided basis, with 50 percent of participants’ time spent in classroom-based instruction, counseling, and leadership development instruction, and 50 percent of participants’ time spent in experiential training on the construction site.

(2) The education component described in paragraph (1) shall include basic skills instruction, secondary education services, and other activities designed to lead to the attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent. The curriculum for this component shall include math, language arts, vocational education, life skills training, social studies related to the cultural and community history of the participants, leadership skills, and other topics at the discretion of the program. Bilingual services shall be available for individuals with limited-English proficiency. A program shall have a
 goal of a minimum teacher-to-participant ratio of one teacher for every 18 participants.

(3) The job training component described in paragraph (1) shall involve work experience and skills training apprenticeships related to construction and rehabilitation activities described in subdivision (a). The process of construction shall be coupled with skills training and with close onsite supervision by experienced trainers. The curriculum for this component shall contain a set of locally agreed upon skills and competencies that are systematically taught, with participants’ mastery assessed individually on a regular, ongoing basis. Safety skills shall be taught at the outset. A program shall have a goal of a minimum trainer-to-participant ratio of one trainer for every seven participants. This component shall be coordinated to the maximum extent feasible with preapprenticeship and apprenticeship opportunities.

(4) Assistance in attaining postsecondary education and in obtaining financial aid shall be made available to participants prior to graduation from the program.

(c) Counseling services designed to assist participants in positively participating in society, including all of the following, as necessary: outreach, assessment, and orientation; individual and peer counseling; life skills training, drug and alcohol abuse education and prevention; and referral to appropriate drug rehabilitation, medical, mental health, legal, housing, and other community services and resources. A program shall have a goal of a minimum counselor-to-participant ratio of one counselor for every 28 participants.

(d) (1) Leadership development training that provides participants with meaningful opportunities to develop
 leadership skills, including decisionmaking, problem solving, and negotiating. A program shall encourage participants to develop strong peer group ties that support their mutual pursuit of skills and values.

(2) Each program shall establish a youth council in which participants are afforded opportunities to develop public speaking and negotiating skills, and management and policymaking participation in specific aspects of the program.

(e) Each participant shall be provided with a training subsidy, living allowance, or stipend of not less than eight dollars ($8) per hour for the time spent at the worksite in construction training. For those participants who receive public assistance, this training subsidy, living allowance, or stipend shall not affect housing benefits, medical benefits, child care benefits, or CalFresh benefits, to the extent consistent with federal law. The
 training subsidy, living allowance, or stipend may be distributed in a manner that offers incentives for good performance.

(f) Full-time participation in a program shall be offered for a period of not less than 6 months and not more than 24 months.

(g) A concentrated effort shall be made to find construction, construction-related, or nonconstruction jobs for all graduates of the program who have performed well. The job training curriculum shall provide participants with basic preparation for seeking and maintaining a job. Followup counseling and assistance in job seeking shall also be provided to participants for a period of 12 months following graduation from the program.

(h) A program serving 20 or more participants is required to have a full-time director responsible for the coordination of the requirements of
 this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 24.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.5.

The department may accept proposals for funding from applicants who establish their eligibility for funding under this article by submitting proof that they have been funded or designated as a federal YouthBuild program by the United States Department of Labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 95, Sec. 2.   (AB 271)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9803.

Program grants may be used for the activities in Section 9802 and for any of the following activities:

(a) Legal fees for housing acquisition.

(b) Administrative and technical assistance costs of the program applicant that may not exceed 15 percent of the program grant, or another amount as is determined by the director to be necessary to support capacity development of a private nonprofit community-based organization. The applicant may contract with a technical assistance provider approved by the director.

(c) Defraying costs for the ongoing training and technical assistance needs of the program applicant that are related to developing and carrying out the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), eligible participants in a program shall be youth between the ages of 17 and 24, inclusive, who are economically disadvantaged, as defined in Section 1503 of Title 29 of the United States Code, and who are in one of the following groups:

(1) Persons who are not attending any school and who have not received a secondary school diploma or its equivalent.

(2) Persons currently enrolled in a traditional or alternative school setting or a GED program and who are in danger of dropping out of school.

(3) Very low income persons whose incomes are at or less than 50 percent of the area median income area, adjusted for family size, as estimated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(b) Not more than 25 percent of program participants may be individuals who do not meet the requirements of subdivision (a). These participants shall be persons who have educational needs despite the attainment of a high school diploma.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9806.

(a) The director shall use the existing infrastructure of federally funded YouthBuild programs to the maximum extent possible. In the 1999–2000 fiscal year, the director shall give first priority in awarding grants under this article to applicants seeking to continue YouthBuild programs established with federal or other funding.

(b) Entities eligible for grants under this article shall be nonprofit private entities and public agencies with experience in operating youth construction skills training, education, job placement, personal development, leadership development, and housing rehabilitation or construction programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9807.

An application for a grant under this article shall, at a minimum, contain all of the following:

(a) The amount of the grant requested and the proposed use of the grant.

(b) A description of the applicant and a statement of the applicant’s qualifications, including a description of the applicant’s past experience in running a YouthBuild program, if applicable, a description of the applicant’s past experience with housing rehabilitation or construction, youth and youth education, youth leadership development, and youth employment training programs, and a description of the applicant’s relationship with apprenticeship programs and with community-based organizations.

(c) A description of the proposed construction site and evidence of site control, and a description of the proposed construction or rehabilitation activities to be undertaken and the anticipated schedule for carrying out those activities.

(d) A description of the educational and job training activities, work opportunities, and other services that will be provided to participants.

(e) A description of the manner in which eligible youths will be recruited and selected, including a description of the arrangements that will be made with community-based organizations, local education agencies and education agencies of Native American nations, public assistance agencies, courts of jurisdiction for status and youth offenders, shelters for homeless individuals and other agencies serving homeless youth, foster care agencies, and other appropriate public agencies and private entities.

(f) A description of the special efforts that will be undertaken to recruit eligible young women as participants, including women with dependent children, including a description of how those women can receive appropriate support, including child care.

(g) A description of how the proposed program will be coordinated with other federal, state, Native American nation, and local agency activities, including public school programs, the Americorps program, crime prevention programs, vocational, adult, and bilingual education programs, and other job training programs.

(h) Substantive assurances that there will be a sufficient number of adequately trained supervisory personnel in the program who have attained the journey level or its equivalent.

(i) A description of the applicant’s relationship with any local building trades union, including a description of the union’s involvement in training and the proposed relationship of the activities to be undertaken pursuant to the grant with established apprenticeship programs.

(j) A description of activities that will be undertaken to develop the leadership skills of participants, including their role in decisionmaking.

(k) A detailed budget and description of a system of fiscal controls and auditing and accountability procedures that will be used to ensure fiscal soundness.

(l) A description of any contracts and arrangements entered into between the applicant and other entities, including all in-kind donations and grants from both public and private sources that will augment grant funds made available pursuant to this article.

(m) Identification and description of the financing proposed for any acquisition of property, or the rehabilitation or construction of housing.

(n) Identification and description of the entity that will operate and manage the property.

(o) A certification that the applicant will comply with the requirements of applicable federal laws, including the Fair Housing Act, Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the Age Discrimination Act of 1975, and that the applicant will work to further fair housing policies.

(p) A description of the qualifications and past experience of the person who will be the full-time director for the applicant’s project to be funded pursuant to this article.

(q) A description of the applicant pool profile, including, but not limited to, the number of participants currently on parole or probation, the number of participants with children requiring paid supervision, and the number of participants with Department of Motor Vehicles or court-sanctioned holds on their drivers’ licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9808.

The term “YouthBuild” shall only be used in connection with a program funded pursuant to this article or by the United States Department of Labor, or if the program is an affiliate of YouthBuild U.S.A.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 95, Sec. 3.   (AB 271)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9809.

Each grant recipient, at the beginning of the grant cycle, shall report to the director, at a minimum, regarding the number of participants who have done any of the following:

(a) Obtained a general education degree (GED).

(b) Obtained full-time, unsubsidized employment in the building trades industry.

(c) Obtained full-time, unsubsidized employment in other industries.

(d) Obtained part-time, unsubsidized employment in the building trades industry or in other industries.

(e) Gained acceptance into a trade apprenticeship program.

(f) Successfully enrolled in a vocational or two-year community college.

(g) Successfully enrolled in a state university, the University of California, or any other four-year college.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9809.5.

Each grant recipient shall report to the director on other participant outcomes as required by the Governor under Section 122(h) of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Jobs for California Graduates Program [9900. - 9908.]

9900.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to support the expansion of the Jobs for California Graduates pilot project in Merced into a regional system of local programs based on the Jobs for America’s Graduates model. The Jobs for California Graduates nonprofit, public-private partnership will create a network of local programs to help California’s at-risk youth complete their secondary education and acquire the basic skills necessary to successfully transition into the workforce or enroll in postsecondary education.

(b) The director of the Employment Development Department, from funds appropriated for this purpose to the Jobs for California Graduates Program, may make grants to applicants for the purpose of carrying out programs as authorized by this article. The grants shall be used to support new and existing Jobs for California Graduates Programs in the central valley region in one or more of the following counties: Sacramento, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Merced, Fresno, Madera, and Kern. The director shall develop criteria for ranking grant applications, and performance standards and auditing procedures for evaluating the effectiveness of the grants. The director may contract with a qualified nonprofit corporation designated by the national organization, Jobs for America’s Graduates, to provide technical assistance to Jobs for California Graduates local programs.

(c) The regional system of Jobs for California Graduates local programs shall be designed to accomplish all of the following goals:

(1) To decrease absenteeism rates for at-risk youth.

(2) To improve the performance of at-risk youth in school and in the workplace.

(3) To improve secondary education completion rates.

(4) To improve employability skills of at-risk youth.

(5) To improve employment placement rates for at-risk youth.

(6) To improve enrollment rates of at-risk youth in postsecondary education and training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9901.

(a) In order to encourage a regional system of long-lasting, self-sustaining model local programs, communities served pursuant to this article shall contribute in-kind and financial resources in direct support of the model local program, according to the following schedule:

(1) During its initial year of implementation, a Jobs for California Graduates local program may receive state funds in an amount equal to 100 percent of the costs of implementing each Jobs for California Graduates Program site, but not to exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000).

(2) During any year subsequent to the initial year of implementation, a model local program may receive state funds in the amount equal to 75 percent of the costs of implementing the model local program, but not to exceed forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000).

(b) Community partners providing matching resources to the model local programs may include private nonprofit corporations, community-based organizations, workforce investment agencies, school districts, and other public and private sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9902.

Local affiliates of the Jobs for California Graduates Program shall include all of the following elements:

(a) (1) A trained youth specialist employed year-round providing individual and group instruction to 25 to 45 eligible youth recruited and selected by a school-based advisory committee comprised of faculty, administrators, and counselors.

(2) The youth specialist shall provide individual attention to students to help them overcome barriers preventing them from receiving a high school diploma or securing employment, or both, or pursuing a postsecondary education that will lead to a career.

(3) The youth specialist shall provide informal guidance to students on academic, career, and life decisions and, based on the individual needs of students, connect them to professional counseling services to address more serious barriers, such as mental health problems or drug abuse.

(4) The youth specialist shall be actively involved in intensive, one-on-one employer marketing and job development activities to identify entry-level job opportunities for students upon graduation. Likewise, the youth specialist shall assist graduates in the exploration of postsecondary education opportunities and help them navigate the financial aid process to pursue these opportunities.

(b) Youth shall be taught a minimum of 37 employment competencies designed to prepare them to secure a quality entry-level job or pursue a postsecondary education, or both, upon completion of their secondary education.

(c) Placement services shall be provided to students during the summer months or partnerships developed with summer youth employment programs to support yearlong learning. Youth specialists shall maintain contact with youth during the summer months.

(d) A student-led organization, associated with a state and national association, shall build on the competency-based curriculum and provide the opportunity for students to develop, practice, and refine their leadership and team membership skills.

(e) It shall serve as a school-based “one-stop center” for participating at-risk youth to ensure that they receive appropriate academic and social services from available resources in the school and community.

(f) It shall provide no less than 12 months of followup and support on the job and in postsecondary education after leaving the school.

(g) It shall provide computerized tracking of youth served, services delivered and performance outcomes, such as graduation rate, positive outcome rates, aggregate employment rate, full-time jobs rate, full-time placement rate, further education rate, wages, and return to school rate, at local and state levels.

(h) It shall provide continuous improvement of results through the ongoing professional development of managers, supervisors, and specialists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9903.

(a) Entities eligible to conduct a Jobs for California Graduates local program shall include, but need not be limited to, local education agencies, community colleges, and nonprofit organizations with an interest in serving at-risk youth.

(b) To maintain eligibility after the initial year of implementation, participating entities shall conduct the Jobs for California Graduates Program in accordance with Jobs for America’s Graduates performance standards, receiving no less than a “Meets Standards” rating on an accreditation review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9904.

To be eligible to receive services through a Jobs for California Graduates local program under this article, a youth shall meet at least two of the following criteria:

(a) One or more years behind modal grade for one’s age group, with particular emphasis on those two or more years behind modal grade.

(b) Below average academic grade point average relative to students in his or her class.

(c) Above average number of absences during the past school year in comparison to other students in the school.

(d) Placed on probation, suspended, or expelled from school one or more times during the past two years.

(e) Pregnant or parenting teen.

(f) Physically or mentally challenged.

(g) Involved with substance abuse or criminal activities.

(h) Member of an economically disadvantaged family.

(i) Lives with only one or neither of his or her natural parents.

(j) Receives little or no academic or social support from home or family.

(k) Mother has not graduated from high school.

(l) Closest friends have limited educational expectations. For example, they do not expect to graduate from high school or have already dropped out of high school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9905.

(a) For purposes of establishing and expanding these programs, the department shall, to the extent feasible, make local grants available throughout the region.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is the intent of the Legislature that Jobs for California Graduates local programs be conducted in a broad range of settings, including urban, suburban, and rural districts, which are representative of all California youth during the initial year of the regional program, in order to test the effectiveness of the model local programs throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9908.

State funds made available pursuant to this article shall be used to carry out both of the following:

(a) The Jobs for California Graduates local program elements specified in Section 9902.

(b) Regional management and technical assistance activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Operation of an office, including the hiring of staff, that shall be responsible for managing and monitoring model local program compliance.

(2) Conducting research and evaluation of all Jobs for California Graduates local programs, retaining a third-party provider as appropriate.

(3) Making available regional training and development opportunities for consistent, effective implementation of the model local programs.

(4) Conducting educational and outreach activities to engage private and public sector employers, secondary and postsecondary educational institutions, the military, state and local elected officials, community and social service organizations, and other interested parties.

(5) Conducting regional activities for students, including, at a minimum, a leadership development conference and a career development conference.

(6) Providing for the continuous improvement of model local program performance outcomes.

(7) Developing and maintaining state and local partnerships with private and public employers, secondary and postsecondary educational institutions, and community and social services organizations.

(8) Providing other support and oversight to promote the continuous improvement of Jobs for California Graduates local programs.

(9) Directly operating local programs as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Employer Elder Care Benefits [9910. - 9912.]

9910.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The percentage of California employers offering pension and retirement plans to employees is substantially lower than the national average.

(2) Many employers lack an understanding of the implications of our coming “age wave,” and how to best assist employees in preparing for the long-term care needs of themselves and their families.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in future years, to develop and to enact legislation to institute elder care and caregiving programs as an employee benefit, holding employers to the same standard in providing benefits and leave time for employees caring for elders as those provided employees caring for children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9912.

(a) The Legislature requests that the Senior Worker Advocate Office of the Employment Development Department work with the California Commission on Aging and other interested organizations including, but not limited to, AARP, in order to conduct outreach to the business community. The Legislature encourages other state entities, including, but not limited to, the California Department of Aging, to join in this effort.

(b) The Legislature requests that this outreach effort be directed at educating employers about the implications of the impending “age wave,” and at providing employers with information on matters relevant to the aging population and on related employment implications.

(c) State funds may not be appropriated for purposes of this article. The Employment Development Department is not required to undertake any new task pursuant to this article unless the department receives federal or private funds for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Displaced Oil and Gas Worker Pilot Program [9920. - 9925.]

9920.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) All efforts funded under this article are intended to supplement and be aligned with the broader workforce and education system in the State of California. This act is intended to focus on innovative approaches to, and proven practices for, addressing employment dislocations associated with oil, gas, and related industries.

(b) The primary purpose of this act is to support workers on the front lines of the state’s transition to carbon neutrality and specifically workers in California’s oil, gas, and related industries, with the services they need to enter, participate in, and complete broader workforce preparation, training, and education
 programs aligned with regional labor market needs. Those who complete these programs should have the skills and competencies necessary to successfully enter the labor market and earn wages that lead to self-sufficiency, and eventually, economic mobility and security.

(c) Populations eligible to be served by grants include, but are not limited to, workers on the front lines of the state’s transition to carbon neutrality and specifically workers in California’s oil and gas industry who are transitioning or dislocated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 43.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 9925.)
-------------------------------------------

9921.

(a) There is hereby established the Displaced Oil and Gas Worker Pilot Program, to be administered by the department, for the purpose of addressing employment dislocations associated with oil, gas, and related industries.

(b) For purposes of this article:

(1) “Department” means the Employment Development Department.

(2) “Program” means the Displaced Oil and Gas Worker Pilot Program.

(3) “Qualified applicant” means a public or private nonprofit organization, local workforce development area, education and training provider, tribal organization,
 faith-based organization, or community-based organization. “Qualified applicant” does not include an individual applicant.

(4) “Target population” means individuals who are transitioning or have been displaced from the oil, gas, and related industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 43.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 9925.)
-------------------------------------------

9922.

(a) The department shall award grants to qualified applicants on a competitive basis using funds to be appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of the program.

(b) The department shall accept grant applications from qualified applicants. The grant application shall identify a lead applicant who shall be deemed the fiscal agent responsible for reporting and monitoring.

(c) The department shall develop criteria for the selection of grant recipients that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Demonstrated experience working to ensure populations who have been dislocated from the labor market
 have access to quality jobs in their regions, with an emphasis on those transitioning or displaced from the oil, gas, and related industries.

(2) Capacity to provide services to target populations and provide evidence of this capacity.

(3) Experience in providing services, consistent with the objectives of the program, to the target population.

(4) Support from partner entities includes, but is not limited to, local workforce development areas, education and training providers, tribal organizations, employers and faith-based organizations, business-based, labor-based organizations, including labor-management partnerships and labor-community partnerships, cultural-based organizations, and services-based organizations.

(5) The specific purpose and goals
 of the grant award, the roles and responsibilities of the lead applicant and partner entities, a discussion of how funds will be used and success will be measured, the number of individuals who will be served, and the services to be provided to these individuals. Documentation shall be included to demonstrate that each partner entity has agreed to the activities in the grant proposal.

(6) A description of how the grant proposal is designed to complement the work of, and integrate the individuals being served with, the broader workforce, education, and employment system within the proposed service area, and evidence that the proposal incorporates innovative strategies or proven practices for service delivery that will create pipelines to quality jobs, including temporary job creation, and income security for workers with an emphasis on career pathway programs aligned with regional labor market needs.

(d) Funding awarded for training shall meet the requirements of high road as defined in subdivisions (r) and (s) of Section 14005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 43.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 9925.)
-------------------------------------------

9923.

(a) Grant recipients shall be evaluated using the following criteria:

(1) Ability to provide the services proposed in the grant to the number of individuals specified in the grant as evidenced by, among other things, whether the grantee has previously completed the same or similar services as proposed.

(2) Ability of individuals to successfully complete relevant programming funded under the grant as demonstrated by relevant measures directly related to the purpose of the program.

(3) Ability of individuals to transition or be integrated into the broader workforce and education system, as evidenced by employment
 and enrollment in relevant programs.

(b) The department shall procure a technical assistance and evaluation contractor to convene communities of practice to identify and help replicate evidence-based practices and to help facilitate an assessment and evaluation of grant performance and program success.

(c) A grant recipient shall participate in grant technical assistance and evaluation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) A grant recipient shall provide all necessary information to the department for purposes of monitoring program performance measures. Program performance shall be based on, but not limited to, the following workforce measures:

(1) Training completion.

(2) Credential
 attainment.

(3) Median earnings and employment of participants after they have exited the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 43.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 9925.)
-------------------------------------------

9924.

Eligible activities for the program and grant funds shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Labor market information.

(b) Career exploration activities.

(c) High school diploma and GED acquisition.

(d) Skills and vocational training that aligns with regional labor market needs.

(e) Work-based learning, transitional jobs, internships, on-the-job training, work experience, preapprenticeship, and apprenticeships.

(f) Stipends for trainees.

(g) Mentoring.

(h) Other remedial education and work readiness skills.

(i) Supportive services.

(j) Entrepreneurial training and support for small business development.

(k) Activities undertaken pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 9923.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 43.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 9925.)
-------------------------------------------

9925.

This article shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 43.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 7, commencing with Section 9920.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Employment Training Panel [10200. - 10217.]

10200.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) California’s economy is being challenged by competition from other states and overseas. In order to meet this challenge, California’s employers, workers, labor organizations, and government need to invest in a skilled and productive workforce, and in developing the skills of frontline workers. For purposes of this section, “frontline worker” means a worker who directly produces or delivers goods or services.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a strategically designed employment training program to promote a healthy labor market in a growing, competitive economy that shall fund only projects that meet the following criteria:

(1) Foster creation of high-wage, high-skilled jobs, or foster retention of high-wage, high-skilled jobs in manufacturing and other industries that are threatened by out-of-state and global competition, including, but not limited to, those industries in which targeted training resources for California’s small- and medium-sized business suppliers will increase the state’s competitiveness to secure federal, private sector, and other nonstate funds, and, in addition, provide for retraining contracts in companies that make a monetary or in-kind contribution to the funded training enhancements.

(2) Encourage industry-based investment in human resources development that promotes the competitiveness of California industry through productivity and product quality enhancements.

(3) Result in secure jobs for those who successfully complete training. All training shall be
 customized to the specific requirements of one or more employers or a discrete industry and shall include general skills, including soft skills, that trainees can use in the future.

(4) Supplement, rather than displace, funds available through existing programs conducted by employers and government-funded training programs, such as the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.), the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (Public Law 98-524), CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the former Enterprise Zone Act (Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), and the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), the California Community Colleges Economic Development Program, or apportionment funds allocated to the community colleges, regional occupational
 centers and programs, or other local educational agencies.

(b) The Employment Training Panel, in funding projects that meet the requirements of subdivision (a), shall give funding priority to those projects that best meet the following goals:

(1) Result in the growth of the California economy by stimulating exports from the state and the production of goods and services that would otherwise be imported from outside the state.

(2) Train new employees of firms locating or expanding in the state that provide high-skilled, high-wage jobs and are committed to an ongoing investment in the training of frontline workers.

(3) Develop workers with skills necessary to work with new technologies or methods.

(4) Train workers who have been displaced, have received notification of impending layoff, or are subject to displacement, because of a plant closure, workforce reduction, changes in technology, or significantly increasing levels of international and out-of-state competition.

(5) Are jointly developed by business management and worker representatives.
